Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2270
Department of Agriculture, Bureau of Animal Industry; cooperation with other organizations.

The Pseudorabies Control and Eradication Act shall be administered by the Bureau of Animal Industry of the department. In administering such act, the department shall cooperate and may contract with persons or appropriate local, state, or national organizations, public or private, for the performance of activities required or authorized pursuant to such act.

Laws 1986, LB 775, § 21;

Laws 1990, LB 1004, § 17;

R.S.Supp.,1990, § 54-2221;

Laws 1991, LB 359, § 35.